Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.190

Reimbursement of extraordinary criminal justice costs.

Counties may submit a petition for relief to the office of public defense for reimbursement of extraordinary criminal justice costs. Extraordinary criminal justice costs are defined as those associated with investigation, prosecution, indigent defense, jury impanelment, expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other adjudication costs of aggravated murder cases.

(1) The office of public defense, in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop procedures for processing the petitions, for auditing the veracity of the petitions, and for prioritizing the petitions. Prioritization of the petitions shall be based on, but not limited to, such factors as disproportionate fiscal impact relative to the county budget, efficient use of resources, and whether the costs are extraordinary and could not be reasonably accommodated and anticipated in the normal budget process.

(2) Before January 1st of each year, the office of public defense, in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a prioritized list of submitted petitions that are recommended for funding by the legislature.

[ 1999 c 303 s 1.]